Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 7
CONSTRUCTION BIDDING FOR STATE-FUNDED LOCAL PROJECTS

29-1-701. Short title.

This part 7 shall be known and may be cited as the "Construction Bidding for State-funded Local Projects Act".

Source:

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire part added, p. 64, § 21, effective January 1, 1990.

29-1-702. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the procedures for procurement by local government of construction projects which will be funded in whole or in part by the state through the highway users tax fund is a matter of statewide concern; that the identification and widespread publication of such projects will increase the competition for such projects leading to a decreased cost to taxpayers throughout the state; that increased privatization of such projects by local governments will aid in the development and retention of local small businesses, industries, and construction firms, will broaden the economic base of local areas, and will contribute to increased economic vitality throughout the state; and that the provisions of this part 7 are enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and welfare of the people of this state.

Source:

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire part added, p. 64, § 21, effective January 1, 1990.

29-1-703. Definitions.

As used in this part 7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agency of local government" means any municipality, county, home rule county, or home rule city or any agency, department, division, board, bureau, commission, institution, or other authority thereof which is a budgetary unit exercising construction contracting authority or discretion and which is located in a county of thirty thousand persons or more, or a city or town of thirty thousand persons or more, according to the state demographer.

"Construction contract" or "contract" means any agreement to construct, alter, improve, repair, or demolish any state-funded public project of any kind.

"Cost" means the total cost of labor, materials, provisions, supplies, equipment rentals, equipment purchases, insurance, supervision, engineering, and clerical and accounting services; the reasonable value of the use of equipment, including its replacement value, owned by the agency; and the reasonable estimates of other administrative or indirect costs not otherwise directly attributable to the state-funded public project which may be reasonably apportioned to such project in accordance with generally accepted cost-accounting principles and standards. To determine the reasonable value of the use of equipment owned by the agency, the agency may utilize rates established in the department of transportation's published equipment rate schedule in force at the time of the estimate or rates established in any other similar, generally accepted, published equipment rate schedule. To determine administrative and indirect costs, the agency may utilize a good faith percentage estimate of not less than fifteen percent of the total direct costs.

"Defined maintenance project" means any project that involves a significant reconstruction, alteration, or improvement of any existing road, highway, bridge, structure, facility, or other public improvement, including but not limited to repairing or seal coating of roads or highways or major internal or external reconstruction or alteration of existing structures. "Defined maintenance project" does not include routine maintenance activities such as snow removal, minor surface repair of roads or highways, cleaning of ditches, regrading of unsurfaced roads, repainting, replacement of floor coverings, or minor reconstruction or alteration of existing structures.

"State-funded public project" means any construction, alteration, repair, demolition, or improvement by any agency of local government of any land, structure, facility, road, highway, bridge, or other public improvement suitable for and intended for use in the promotion of the public health, welfare, or safety and any defined maintenance project, which are funded in whole or in part from the highway users tax fund and which may be reasonably expected to exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars in the aggregate for any fiscal year.

Source:

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire part added, p. 64, § 21, effective January 1, 1990.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 1069, § 41, effective July 1.

29-1-704. Construction of public projects - competitive sealed bidding.

All construction contracts for state-funded public projects shall be awarded by competitive sealed bidding except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

Competitive sealed bidding shall not be required for:

A state-funded public project for which the agency of local government receives no bids or for which all bids have been rejected;

A state-funded public project for which the responsible officer determines it is necessary to make emergency procurements or contracts because there exists a threat to public health, welfare, or safety under emergency conditions, but such emergency procurements or contracts shall be made with such competition as is practicable under the circumstances; however, a written determination of the basis for the emergency and for the selection of the particular contractor shall be included in the contract file.

Nothing in this part 7 shall be construed to affect or limit any additional requirements imposed upon an agency of local government for awarding contracts for state-funded public projects.

Source:

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire part added, p. 65, § 21, effective January 1, 1990.

29-1-705. Agency of local government to submit cost estimate.

Whenever an agency of local government proposes to undertake the construction of a state-funded public project, by any means or method other than by a contract awarded by competitive bid, it shall prepare and submit a cost estimate in the same manner as other bidders. Such agency of government itself may not undertake the proposed state-funded public project unless it shows the lowest and most responsive cost estimate.

Agencies of local government shall not be required to be bonded when performing the work on a state-funded public project.

Source:

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire part added, p. 65, § 21, effective January 1, 1990.

29-1-706. Finality of determinations.

The determinations required by section 29-1-704 (2) are final and conclusive unless they are clearly erroneous, arbitrary, capricious, or contrary to law or are not supported by substantial evidence.

Source:

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire part added, p. 65, § 21, effective January 1, 1990.

29-1-707. Prohibition of dividing work of state-funded public project.

It is unlawful for any person to divide the work of a state-funded public project into two or more separate projects for the sole purpose of evading or attempting to evade the requirements of this part 7.

Source:

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

Entire part added, p. 65, § 21, effective January 1, 1990.